Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.76, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Certain long-term ambulatory electrocardiogram monitoring services. new text end new text begin (a) For the purpose of this subdivision, "long-term ambulatory electrocardiogram monitoring services" means the provision of external cardiac patch monitoring devices to patients to wear for 48 hours or greater and the interpretation of data gathered by such devices to detect heart arrhythmias that can lead to stroke, cardiac arrest, or other comorbidities or medical complications if not correctly diagnosed. new text end new text begin (b) Effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, the commissioner must reimburse diagnostic testing facilities providing long-term ambulatory electrocardiogram monitoring services at 100 percent of the Medicare Physician Fee Schedule rate for such services or higher. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end